Oklahoma, session 2025, SB929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 621, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 621. As used in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act:
1. “Board” means the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners;
2. “Osteopathic medicine” means a patient-centered system of
health care founded by Andrew Taylor Still, M.D., D.O., and based on
the theory that the body is capable of making its own remedies
against disease and other toxic conditions when it is in a normal
structural relationship and has favorable environmental conditions
and adequate nutrition. Osteopathic medicine emphasizes prevention
and wellness and utilizes generally accepted physical,
pharmacological and surgical methods of diagnosis and therapy while
placing strong emphasis on the importance of body mechanics and
manipulative methods to detect and correct faulty structure and
function;
3. “Osteopathic physician” means a person who is licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine in this state; and
4. “School of osteopathic medicine” or “college of osteopathic
medicine” means a legally chartered school or college accredited by
the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation requiring:
a. for admission to its courses of study, a preliminary
education equal to the requirements established by the
American Osteopathic Association, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 3

b. for granting the D.O. degree, Doctor of Osteopathic
Medicine, actual attendance at such osteopathic school
or college and demonstration of successful completion
of the curriculum and recommendation for graduation.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 622, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 622. A. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this
section, it shall be unlawful for any person to practice as an
osteopathic physician and surgeon in this state, without a license
to do so, issued by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners;
provided, that any license or certificate issued under the laws of
this state, authorizing its holder to practice osteopathic medicine,
shall remain in full force and effect. Persons who hold themselves
out as osteopathic physicians in this state without a license issued
by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall submit themselves
to the jurisdiction of the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners.
2. Osteopathic physicians engaged in postgraduate training
beyond the internship year, also known as PGY-1, shall be licensed.
Osteopathic physicians engaged in the internship or PGY-1 year may
be eligible for shall be issued a resident training license and all
other postgraduate students shall be issued an advanced resident
training license.
3. Osteopathic physicians engaged in interventional pain
management pursuant to the Oklahoma Interventional Pain Management
and Treatment Act shall be licensed by the State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners.
B. 1. A person within or outside of this state who performs
through electronic communications diagnostic or treatment services
or other medical services within the scope of practice of an
osteopathic physician and surgeon, including but not limited to,
stroke prevention and treatment, for any patient whose condition is
being diagnosed or treated within this state shall be licensed in
this state, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act. However, in such cases, a nonresident osteopathic
physician who, while located outside this state, consults on an
irregular basis with a physician who is located in this state is not
required to be licensed in this state.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 4

2. Any osteopathic physician licensed in this state who engages
in the practice of medicine or the prescription of drugs, devices,
or treatments via electronic means may do so only in the context of
an appropriate physician/patient physician-patient relationship
wherein a proper patient record is maintained including, at the
minimum, a current history and physical.
3. Any commissioned medical officer of the armed forces Armed
Forces of the United States or medical officer of the United States
Public Health Service or the Veterans Administration of the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, in the discharge of official
duties and/or whose practice is confined entirely within federally
controlled facilities, who is fully licensed to practice osteopathic
medicine and surgery in one or more jurisdictions of the United
States shall not be required to be licensed in this state pursuant
to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act, unless the person already
holds an osteopathic medical license in this state pursuant to the
Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. In such case, the medical
officer shall be subject to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act.
4. A person who performs any of the functions covered by this
subsection submits themselves to the jurisdiction of the courts of
this state for the purposes of any cause of action resulting from
the functions performed.
C. A hospital, as defined in Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, or a related institution, as such terms are
defined in Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which
has the principal purpose or function of providing hospital or
medical care, including, but not limited to, any corporation,
association, trust, or other organization organized and operated for
such purpose, may employ one or more persons who are duly licensed
to practice osteopathic medicine in this state without being
regarded as itself practicing osteopathic medicine within the
meaning and provisions of this section. The employment by the
hospital or related institution of any person who is duly licensed
shall not, in and of itself, be considered as an act of
unprofessional conduct by the person so employed. Nothing provided
herein shall eliminate, limit or restrict the liability for any act
or failure to act of any hospital, any hospital’s employees or
persons duly licensed to practice osteopathic medicine.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 5

D. Nothing in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act shall be
construed as to require an osteopathic physician to secure an
Osteopathic Continuous Certification (OCC) as a condition of
licensure, reimbursement, employment or admitting privileges at a
hospital in this state. For the purposes of this subsection,
“Osteopathic Continuous Certification (OCC)” shall mean a continuing
education program measuring core competencies in the practice of
medicine and surgery and approved by a nationally-recognized
accrediting organization.
E. An osteopathic physician licensed under the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act may not hold himself or herself out as a
board-certified specialist unless the osteopathic physician has
successfully completed the requirements for certification by the
American Osteopathic Association, the American Board of Medical
Specialties, or the American Association of Physician Specialists.
However, an osteopathic physician may indicate the services offered
and may state that his or her practice is limited to one or more
types of services when this statement accurately reflects the scope
of practice of the osteopathic physician.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 624, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 190, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 624), is amended to read as follows:
Section 624. A. There is hereby re-created created the State
Board of Osteopathic Examiners.
B. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall consist of
eight (8) examiners appointed by the Governor, two of whom shall may
be lay persons. The remaining examiners shall be regularly licensed
osteopathic physicians in good standing in this state who have been
so engaged for a period of at least five (5) years immediately prior
to their appointment. The osteopathic physician examiners shall be
appointed by the Governor from a list of not less than six names
submitted to the Governor by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association
annually, and any present member of the State Board of Osteopathic
Examiners shall be appointed to fill out the unexpired term. All
appointments made to the Board shall be for terms of seven (7)
years. In the event of a vacancy brought about for any reason, the
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 6

post so vacated shall be filled from a list of not less than six
names submitted by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association.
C. The mission of the Board shall be to:
1. Safeguard public health by ensuring the highest standards of
osteopathic medical practice and ethical standards;
2. Uphold the integrity of the profession through continuing
education, diligent licensing and regulation, and continuous
oversight of osteopathic physicians and surgeons; and
3. Promote the principles of osteopathic medicine, enhance the
access and quality of patient care, particularly in rural and
underserved areas, and protect the residents of this state through
effective governance, sound public policy, and enforcement of
ethical and professional standards.
D. The Board shall have and use a common seal, and make and
adopt all necessary rules relating to the enforcement of the
provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. Each Board
member shall receive the daily per diem rate for state employees.
Travel expenses allowed under the State Travel Reimbursement Act
shall also be provided to Board members traveling more than fifty
(50) miles to the location of all regular and special Board
meetings.
E. A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 625, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 625. Each member of said Board the State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners shall, before entering upon the duties of the
office, take the oath of office prescribed by the Oklahoma
Constitution before someone qualified to administer oaths, and
shall, except for the lay person, make oath that the member is a
legally qualified practitioner of osteopathic medicine in this
state; and that the member has been engaged in the active practice
of osteopathic medicine in this state at least five (5) years
preceding the appointment of such member.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 7

SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 626, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 626. A. 1. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners
shall, immediately after the members have qualified, elect a
president, vice-president vice president and secretary-treasurer
secretary.
2. The president of said the Board shall preside at all
meetings of the Board and perform such other duties as the Board by
its rule may prescribe.
3. The vice-president vice president shall perform all the
duties of the president, during the president’s absence or
disability.
4. The secretary-treasurer secretary shall keep ensure a record
is kept of all proceedings of the Board and perform such other
duties as are prescribed in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,
or which may be prescribed by said the Board. It shall be the duty
of the secretary-treasurer to receive and care for all monies coming
into the hands of said Board, and to pay out the same upon orders of
the Board.
B. The State Board and such employees as determined by the
Board shall be bonded as required by Sections 85.26 85.58Q through
85.31 85.58V of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The State Board may expend such funds as are necessary in
implementing the duties of the Board. The Board may hire:
1. An executive director and, who may hire all necessary
administrative, clerical and stenographic assistance as the Board
shall deem necessary at a salary to be fixed by the Board and
consistent with a budget to be fixed by the Board;
2. An attorney, on a case-by-case basis, to represent the Board
in legal matters and to assist authorized state and county officers
in prosecuting or restraining violations of the provisions of the
Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act. The Board shall fix the
compensation of said attorney; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 8

3. One or more investigators, at least one of whom shall be
certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training
as a peace officer, as may be necessary to implement the provisions
of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act at an annual salary to be
fixed by the Board, and may authorize necessary expenses. In
addition, the investigators may investigate and inspect, through use
of a Board subpoena, the nonfinancial business records of all
persons licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act
in order to determine whether or not licensees are in compliance
with the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act and the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Act or any other law, rule of the
State of Oklahoma this state, or any federal law or rule affecting
the practice of osteopathic medicine.
D. Any licensee or applicant for license subject to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act shall be deemed
to have given consent to after presented with a Board subpoena by
any duly authorized employee or agent of the Board to access, enter,
or inspect the records, either on-site or at the Board office, or
facilities of such licensee or applicant subject to the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act. Refusal Unless the Board subpoena is
legally challenged, refusal to allow such access, entry, or
inspection may constitute grounds for the denial, nonrenewal,
suspension, or revocation of a license. Upon refusal of such
access, entry, or inspection, pursuant to this section, the Board or
a duly authorized representative may make application for and to
enforce the Board subpoena or to obtain a search warrant from the
district court where the facility or records are located to allow
such access, entry, or inspection.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 627, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 627. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall
preserve a record of its proceedings which shall be kept
electronically and open to public inspection at all reasonable
times, showing:.
B. The official register of licensed osteopathic physicians
available to the public shall include:
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 9

1. The name, age gender, license type, license status, and
place of residence practice of each applicant licensee;
2. The time spent in the study of osteopathic medicine;
3. The year and school from which degrees were granted;
4. Its proceeding relative to the issuance, refusal, renewal,
suspension, or revocation of licenses applied for, and issued
pursuant to the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act; and
5. The name, known place of business and residence, and the
date and number of license of each registered osteopathic physician
and surgeon practice specialty of each licensee and indication of
whether the licensee is board certified in such specialty; and
3. Whether the licensee has had disciplinary action taken on
his or her Oklahoma license.
The register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters
contained therein.
B. The secretary of said Board shall on the first of March of
each year submit an official copy of said register to the Secretary
of State for permanent record. A certified copy of said register,
or any part thereof, with the hand and seal of the secretary of said
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, or the Secretary of State,
shall be admitted in evidence in all courts of the state.
C. It To ensure the accuracy of Board records, it shall be the
responsibility of each osteopathic physician licensed under this act
the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act to provide notify the Board
with a notice of any change of address within fourteen (14) business
days after any relocation of practice activity to the physician’s
registry information.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 628.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall have the power
to:
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 10

1. Adopt and prescribe the use of a common seal;
2. Hold regular meetings at times to be fixed by the president
of the Board in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act. In addition, the president may call such special and
other meetings in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Open Meeting Act;
3. Promulgate rules necessary, expedient, or appropriate to the
governance, performance, enforcement, or carrying out of any of the
purposes, objectives, or provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act or to promulgate rules regarding the professional
standards of the practice of osteopathic medicine;
4. Initiate and prosecute administrative, civil, or criminal
actions and proceedings necessary under the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act;
5. Appoint authorized agents to make inspections or
investigations and to perform other services for the Board;
6. Sell, exchange, or dispose of property as provided by state
law;
7. Have jurisdiction over all matters affecting the practice of
osteopathic medicine, and shall have continuing jurisdiction to
reopen any actions taken by the Board;
8. Institute collection proceedings against licensees,
applicants, and other entities under its jurisdiction. This
authority includes the right to impose penalties for nonpayment;
9. Employ, appoint, or contract and fix the duties and
compensation of the executive director and other personnel, either
on full-time, part-time, or contractual basis, as deemed necessary
by the Board;
10. Fix the qualifications of the personnel of the Board;
11. Accept and use grants of money and other property from any
source;
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 11

12. Advise, consult, cooperate, and enter into agreements or
contracts;
13. Revoke, suspend, or deny any license, permit, or charter
issued by the Board if the Board finds any violation of the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act or any rule promulgated by the Board;
14. Prescribe forms of application, certification, licenses,
charters, permits, and other forms as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act;
15. Set renewal dates for any licenses, permits, or
certificates issued by the Board by notifying licensees in writing
of the expiration and renewal date being assigned to the licensee
and permittee and by making an appropriate adjustment in the fee
charged for the license, permit, or certificate;
16. Establish and collect fees for licenses, permits, charters,
certificates, and services provided. The fees shall be promulgated
in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act and shall be
fair and equitable to all parties concerned;
17. Adopt official professional standards of conduct;
18. Apply to the district court for a temporary or permanent
injunction or any other remedy restraining any person from violating
the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act;
19. Increase its efforts to ensure the safety and well-being of
patients through administration of continuing education programs;
20. Establish agency special accounts through the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services and the Office of the State
Treasurer as necessary for the collection and distribution of funds,
including funds of sponsors and registration fees related to
conferences, meetings, and continuing education and resident
physician training; and
21. Exercise all incidental powers which are necessary and
proper to implement and administer the purposes of the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 12

SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 632, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 632. A. The examination of those who desire to
practice as osteopathic physicians shall embrace those general
subjects and topics, a knowledge of which is commonly and generally
required of candidates for a D.O. degree, Doctor of Osteopathy or
Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine, by accredited osteopathic colleges
in the United States. An examination furnished by the National
Board of Osteopathic Medical Examiners shall be deemed to fulfill
this requirement.
B. The applicant may be accepted who has successfully completed
the examination sequence of the National Board of Osteopathic
Medical Examiners and meets all other requirements as prescribed by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners through rule.
C. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall have
exclusive power and authority to determine the qualifications and
fitness of all applicants for admission to practice osteopathic
medicine in this state. The Board shall require that each applicant
submit to a national criminal history record check as defined in
Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Board shall
not disseminate criminal history record information resulting from
the background record check outside of this state.
D. 1. The Board is authorized to obtain a national criminal
history record check on osteopathic physician applicants seeking a
letter of qualification for purposes of registration for expedited
licensure through the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact pursuant
to Section 493.7 of this title.
2. Oklahoma osteopathic physician applicants seeking a letter
of qualification under the Compact shall be fingerprinted for the
national criminal history record check. Applicant fingerprints
shall be submitted to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation and
the national criminal history record check shall be conducted in
accordance with Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
The Bureau shall return national criminal history record check
results to the Board.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 13

3. Results obtained from the national criminal history record
check shall be used solely for the screening of osteopathic
physician applicants and shall be retained by the Board. The Board
shall not disseminate criminal history record information resulting
from the record check.
4. This subsection shall only apply to Oklahoma osteopathic
physician applicants seeking an expedited license under the Compact.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 633, as
amended by Section 5, Chapter 262, O.S.L. 2022 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 633), is amended to read as follows:
Section 633. A. Each applicant who has met all requirements
for licensure shall be issued a full and unrestricted license to
practice as an osteopathic physician and surgeon. Upon application,
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may also issue special
licenses, permits, warrants, and certificates including, but not
limited to, a:
1. Temporary License license;
2. Resident Training License training license;
3. Telemedicine License;
4. Military Spouse License Advanced resident training license;
or
5. 4. Temporary critical need license under Section 1 of this
act Section 6011 of this title.
B. The Board shall, through rule, establish restrictions for
special licenses including, but not limited to, training licenses,
to ensure that the holder practices only under appropriate
circumstances as set by the Board.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 634, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 634. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may issue
a license without examination to a practitioner who is currently
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 14

licensed in any country, state, territory or province, upon the
following conditions:
1. That the requirements of registration in the country, state,
territory or province in which the applicant is licensed are deemed
by the State Board to have been equivalent to the requirements of
registration in force in this state at the date of such license;
2. That the applicant has no disciplinary matters pending
against him or her in any country, state, territory or province; and
3. That the license being reciprocated must have been obtained
by an examination in that country, state, territory or province
deemed by the Board to be equivalent to that used by the Board, or
obtained by examination of the National Board of Osteopathic Medical
Examiners.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 635.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 635.1. A. There is established a special volunteer
medical license for physicians who are retired from active practice
and wish to donate their expertise for the medical care and
treatment of indigent and needy persons of the state. The special
volunteer medical license shall be:
1. Issued by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners to
eligible physicians;
2. Issued without a payment of an application fee, license fee
or renewal fee;
3. Issued or renewed without any continuing education
requirements;
4. Issued for a fiscal year or part thereof; and
5. 4. Renewable annually upon approval of the Board.
B. A physician must meet the following requirements to be
eligible for a special volunteer medical license:
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 15

1. Completion of a special volunteer medical license
application, including documentation of the physician’s osteopathic
school graduation and practice history;
2. Documentation that the physician has been previously issued
a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in Oklahoma
this state or in another state of the United States and that he or
she has never been the subject of any medical disciplinary action in
any jurisdiction;
3. Acknowledgement and documentation that the physician’s
practice under the special volunteer medical license will be
exclusively and totally devoted to providing medical care to needy
and indigent persons in Oklahoma this state or to providing care
under the Oklahoma Medical Reserve Corps; and
4. Acknowledgement and documentation that the physician will
not receive or have the expectation to receive any payment or
compensation, either direct or indirect, for any medical services
rendered under the special volunteer medical license.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 635.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 635.3. A. There is established in this state a
resident training license for medical school graduates during their
internship or first postgraduate year (PGY-1). The resident
training license shall be:
1. Issued by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners to
eligible physicians;
2. Issued without any continuing education requirements; and
3. Issued for no more than one (1) year; and
4. Nonrenewable unless renewal is specifically approved by the
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners.
B. If the physician’s resident training program specifically
approves the resident to have prescribing authority, the resident
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 16

training license shall permit the physician to apply for prescribing
privileges from state or federal authorities.
C. The resident training license shall not permit:
1. The physician to practice medicine beyond the scope allowed
by the physician’s training program; or
2. The licensee to practice independent of the residency
program;.
D. The resident training license is not a prerequisite to
participation in any internship or PGY-1 training program.
E. Any person holding a resident training license is not
guaranteed subsequent full or advanced resident licensure in
Oklahoma this state as an osteopathic physician.
F. Any application for full licensure shall be adjudged by the
Board on its own merits including training, education and personal
background.
G. A physician shall meet the following requirements to be
eligible for a resident training license:
1. Completion of a resident training license application;
2. Payment of the application fee; and
3. Documentation from the applicant’s Oklahoma training program
recommending the physician and stating the applicant meets all the
requirements for such licensure.
SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 635.4 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may issue an
osteopathic faculty license without examination to an individual who
remits an electronic application and fee, as set by the Board, who:
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 17

1. Demonstrates to the Board that he or she is currently
licensed to practice osteopathic medicine in another jurisdiction in
the United States;
2. Demonstrates to the Board that he or she is a graduate of an
accredited school of osteopathic medicine; and
3. Has completed the requirements of general licensure as
defined by the Board.
B. The license shall authorize the holder to practice only in
conjunction with his or her teaching duties at an accredited school
of osteopathic medicine or in its affiliated teaching hospitals or
clinics.
C. Such license shall automatically expire upon termination of
the holder’s relationship with the school or after a period of
twenty-four (24) months, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 637, as
amended by Section 5, Chapter 150, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 637), is amended to read as follows:
Section 637. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may
institute disciplinary action, enforce sanctions, or refuse to admit
a person to an examination or may refuse to issue or reinstate or
may suspend or revoke any license issued or reinstated by the Board
upon proof that the applicant or holder of such a license:
1. Has obtained a license, license renewal or authorization to
sit for an examination, as the case may be, through fraud,
deception, misrepresentation or bribery; or has been granted a
license, license renewal or authorization to sit for an examination
based upon a material mistake of fact;
2. Has engaged in the use or employment of dishonesty, fraud,
misrepresentation, false promise, false pretense, unethical conduct
or unprofessional conduct, as may be determined by the Board, in the
performance of the functions or duties of an osteopathic physician,
including, but not limited to, the following:
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 18

a. obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation; willfully and continually
overcharging or overtreating patients; or charging for
visits to the physician’s office which did not occur
or for services which were not rendered,
b. using intimidation, coercion or deception to obtain or
retain a patient or discourage the use of a second
opinion or consultation,
c. willfully performing inappropriate or unnecessary
treatment, diagnostic tests or osteopathic medical or
surgical services,
d. delegating professional responsibilities to a person
who is not qualified by training, skill, competency,
age, experience or licensure to perform them, noting
that delegation may only occur within an appropriate
doctor-patient physician-patient relationship, wherein
a proper patient record is maintained including, but
not limited to, at the minimum, a current history and
physical,
e. misrepresenting that any disease, ailment, or
infirmity can be cured by a method, procedure,
treatment, medicine or device,
f. acting in a manner which results in final disciplinary
action by any professional society or association or
hospital or medical staff of such hospital in this or
any other state, whether agreed to voluntarily or not,
if the action was in any way related to professional
conduct, professional competence, malpractice or any
other violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine
Act,
g. signing a blank prescription form; or dispensing,
prescribing, administering or otherwise distributing
any drug, controlled substance or other treatment
without sufficient examination or the establishment of
a physician-patient relationship, or for other than
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 19

medically accepted therapeutic or experimental or
investigational purpose duly authorized by a state or
federal agency, or not in good faith to relieve pain
and suffering, or not to treat an ailment, physical
infirmity or disease, or violating any state or
federal law on controlled dangerous substances
including, but not limited to, prescribing, dispensing
or administering opioid drugs in excess of the maximum
limits authorized in Section 2-309I of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes,
h. engaging in any sexual activity within a physician-
patient relationship,
i. terminating the care of a patient without adequate
notice or without making other arrangements for the
continued care of the patient,
j. failing to furnish a copy of a patient’s medical
records upon a proper request from the patient or
legal agent of the patient or another physician; or
failing to comply with any other law relating to
medical records,
k. failing to comply with any subpoena issued by the
Board,
l. violating a probation agreement with or order with
from this Board or any other agency, and
m. failing to keep complete and accurate records of
purchase and disposal of controlled drugs or narcotic
drugs;
3. Has engaged in gross negligence, gross malpractice or gross
incompetence;
4. Has engaged in repeated acts of negligence, malpractice or
incompetence;
5. Has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere in a criminal prosecution, for any
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 20

offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions or
duties of an osteopathic physician, whether or not a sentence is
imposed, and regardless of the pendency of an appeal;
6. Has had the authority to engage in the activities regulated
by the Board revoked, suspended, restricted, modified or limited, or
has been reprimanded, warned or censured, probated or otherwise
disciplined by any other state or federal agency whether or not
voluntarily agreed to by the physician including, but not limited
to, the denial of licensure, surrender of the license, permit or
authority, allowing the license, permit or authority to expire or
lapse, or discontinuing or limiting the practice of osteopathic
medicine pending disposition of a complaint or completion of an
investigation;
7. Has violated or failed to comply with provisions of any act
or regulation administered by the Board;
8. Is incapable, for medical or psychiatric or any other good
cause, of discharging the functions of an osteopathic physician in a
manner consistent with the public’s health, safety and welfare;
9. Has been guilty of advertising by means of knowingly false
or deceptive statements;
10. Has been guilty of advertising, practicing, or attempting
to practice under a name other than one’s own;
11. Has violated or refused to comply with a lawful order of
the Board;
12. Has been guilty of habitual drunkenness, or habitual
addiction to the use of morphine, cocaine or other habit-forming
drugs;
13. Has been guilty of personal offensive behavior, which would
include, but not be limited to, obscenity, lewdness, and
molestation;
14. Has performed an abortion as defined by Section 1-730 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except for an abortion necessary
to prevent the death of the mother or to prevent substantial or
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 21

irreversible physical impairment of the mother that substantially
increases the risk of death. The performance of an abortion on the
basis of the mental or emotional health of the mother shall be a
violation of this paragraph, notwithstanding a claim or diagnosis
that the woman may engage in conduct which she intends to result in
her death. The Board shall impose a penalty as provided in this
section and in Section 637.1 of this title on a licensee who
violates this paragraph. The penalty shall include, but not be
limited to, suspension of the license for a period not less than one
(1) year;
15. Has been adjudicated to be insane, or incompetent, or
admitted to an institution for the treatment of psychiatric
disorders; or
16. Has knowingly provided gender transition procedures as
defined in Section 1 of this act Section 2607.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes to a child;
17. Has violated any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Pharmacy
Act, which shall be punishable by appropriate actions established in
rules promulgated by the Board; or
18. Has breached the American Osteopathic Association Code of
Ethics or the Osteopathic Oath.
B. The Board may enter an order denying licensure or imposing
any of the penalties as prescribed by rule against any applicant for
licensure or licensee who is found guilty of violating any provision
of subsection A of this section. In determining what action is
appropriate, the Board shall first consider what sanctions are
necessary to protect the public or to compensate the patient. Only
after those sanctions have been imposed may the Board consider and
include in the order requirements designed to rehabilitate the
physician. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this subsection shall be the obligation of the physician.
C. In any administrative action against a physician that does
not involve revocation or suspension of a license, the Board shall
have the burden, by the greater weight of the evidence, to establish
the existence of grounds for disciplinary action. The Board shall
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 22

establish grounds for revocation or suspension of a license by clear
and convincing evidence.
D. The Board shall not reinstate the license or certificate of
an osteopathic physician, or cause a license or certificate to be
issued to a person it has deemed unqualified, until such time as it
is satisfied that he or she has complied with all the terms and
conditions set forth in the final order and that such person is
capable of safely engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine.
However, the Board shall not issue a license to, or reinstate the
license of, any osteopathic physician found by the Board to have
committed repeated medical malpractice, regardless of the extent to
which the licensee or prospective licensee has complied with all
terms and conditions set forth in the final order or is capable of
safely engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine.
E. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall neither
refuse to renew, nor suspend, nor revoke any license, however, for
any of these causes, unless the person accused has been given at
least twenty (20) days’ notice in writing of the charge against him
or her and a public hearing by the Board; provided, three-fourths
(3/4) of a quorum present at a meeting may vote to suspend a license
in an emergency situation if the licensee affected is provided a
public hearing within thirty (30) days of the emergency suspension.
C. F. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall have the
power to order or subpoena the attendance of witnesses, the
inspection of records and premises and the production of relevant
books and papers for the investigation of matters that may come
before them it. The presiding officer of the Board or his or her
designee shall have the authority to compel the giving of testimony
as is conferred on courts of justice.
D. G. Any osteopathic physician in this state whose license to
practice osteopathic medicine is revoked or suspended under this
section shall have the right to seek judicial review of a ruling of
the Board pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.
E. H. The Board may enact rules and regulations pursuant to the
Administrative Procedures Act setting out additional acts of
unprofessional conduct, which acts shall be grounds for refusal to
issue or reinstate, or for action to condition, suspend or revoke a
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 23

license necessary or appropriate to the performance, enforcement, or
carrying out of any of the purposes, objectives, or provisions of
this section.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 637.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. At any time after the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners
has revoked or suspended the license of any person to practice
osteopathic medicine or surgery, the Board, upon its own motion and
of its own authority and right, may reconsider such order and
decision for any reason deemed by it to be sufficient and may, in
its discretion, reinstate the license of such person.
B. At any time after the expiration of twelve (12) months from
the date the license of any person to practice osteopathic medicine
or surgery has been revoked with the right to reapply, or at any
time after the expiration of six (6) months from the date the
license of any person to practice osteopathic medicine or surgery
has been suspended by the Board, such person whose license has been
so revoked or suspended may file an application with the executive
director of the Board, together with an application fee set by the
Board, to reinstate the license. The Board may further prescribe
through rule a process in which an application to reinstate such
license may be pursued.
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 637.3 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners is hereby given
quasi-judicial powers while sitting as a Board for the purpose of
revoking, suspending, or imposing other disciplinary actions upon
the license of an osteopathic physician or surgeon of this state.
B. To the extent necessary to allow the Board the power to
enforce disciplinary actions imposed by the Board, in the exercise
of its authority, the Board may punish willful violations of its
orders and impose additional penalties as allowed by Section 638 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 24

SECTION 17. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 641, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 641. A. All persons legally licensed to practice
osteopathic medicine in this state, on or before the first day of
July of each year, shall apply to the secretary-treasurer of the
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, on forms furnished thereby,
for a renewal certificate of registration entitling such licensee to
practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in Oklahoma during the
next ensuing fiscal year.
B. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may prescribe
through rule the necessary information required relevant to a
licensee’s professional activity including, but not limited to:
1. Any action taken against the licensee for acts or conduct
similar to acts or conduct described in the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act as grounds for disciplinary action;
2. Any adverse judgment, settlement, or award against the
licensee arising from a professional liability claim;
3. The licensee’s voluntary surrender of or voluntary
limitation on any license or authorization to practice medicine and
surgery in any jurisdiction including military, public health, and
foreign;
4. Any denial to the licensee of a license or authorization to
practice medicine and surgery by any jurisdiction including
military, public health, or foreign;
5. The licensee’s voluntary resignation from the medical staff
of any health care institution or voluntary limitation of the
licensee’s staff privileges at such an institution if that action
occurred while the licensee was under formal or informal
investigation by the institution or a committee thereof for any
reason related to alleged medical incompetence, unprofessional or
unethical conduct, or mental or physical impairment;
6. The licensee’s voluntary resignation or withdrawal from a
national, state, or county medical society, association, or
organization if that action occurred while the licensee was under
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 25

formal or informal investigation or review by that body for any
reason related to alleged medical incompetence, unprofessional or
unethical conduct, or mental or physical impairment;
7. Whether the licensee has had any health conditions that may
affect his or her ability to practice safely. Disclosures shall
focus on current impairments that directly affect clinical
competence or adversely affect ability to practice medicine in a
competent, ethical, and professional manner, not on past or managed
health conditions that do not impair professional duties; and
8. The licensee’s completion of continuing medical education or
other forms of professional maintenance or evaluation, including
specialty board certification or recertification, during the
previous registration period.
C. 1. Each application shall be accompanied by a renewal fee
in an amount sufficient to cover the cost and expense incurred by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, for a renewal of the
person’s certificate to practice osteopathic medicine.
2. The Board may provide for the late renewal of a license upon
payment of a late fee in accordance with Board rules.
C. D. 1. In addition to the payment of the annual renewal fee,
each licensee applying for a renewal of the certificate shall
furnish to the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners proof that the
person has attended at least two (2) days of the annual educational
program conducted by the Oklahoma Osteopathic Association, or its
equivalent, as determined by the Board, in the fiscal year preceding
the application for a renewal; provided, the Board may excuse the
failure of the licensee to attend the educational program in the
case of illness or other unavoidable casualty rendering it
impossible for the licensee to have attended the educational program
or its equivalent.
2. The Board shall require that the licensee receive not less
than one (1) hour of education in pain management or one (1) hour of
education in opioid use or addiction each year preceding an
application for renewal of a license, unless the licensee has
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Board that the licensee does
not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 26

registration number. Such education may be held at the annual
educational program referenced in paragraph 1 of this subsection.
D. E. The secretary of the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners
shall send a written notice to every person holding a legal
certificate to practice osteopathic medicine in this state, at least
thirty (30) days prior to the first day of July each year, directed
to the last-known address of the licensee, notifying the licensee
that it will be necessary for the licensee to pay the renewal
license fee as herein provided, and proper forms shall accompany the
notice upon which the licensee shall make application for renewal of
the certificate.
F. The licensee shall attest to the veracity of the application
form for license renewal. Failure to report fully and correctly
shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the Board.
G. The Board shall establish a system for reviewing renewal
forms. The Board may initiate investigations and disciplinary
proceedings based on information submitted by licensees for license
renewal.
SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 641.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. All osteopathic physicians in active practice licensed by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall maintain a policy for
professional malpractice liability insurance; provided, however,
that such requirement shall not apply to osteopathic physicians:
1. Covered by a group or hospital malpractice liability
insurance policy;
2. Practicing in a state facility subject to The Governmental
Tort Claims Act, Section 151 et seq. of Title 51 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. Practicing in a federal facility subject to the Federal Tort
Claims Act;
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 27

4. Providing care as a volunteer under a special volunteer
medical license pursuant to Section 635.1 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes or a temporary critical need license under Section
6011 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Providing care as a retired osteopathic physician with a
valid license in a volunteer, nonpaid capacity;
6. Practicing or residing in another state or country, who will
not practice within this state during the license renewal year. An
osteopathic physician that is residing but not practicing in this
state but wishes to maintain an active license may sign an affidavit
stating that the osteopathic physician is not practicing osteopathic
medicine, listing the specific dates during which the osteopathic
physician will not practice. The osteopathic physician must notify
the Board in writing and provide proof of malpractice liability
insurance no fewer than ten (10) days prior to resuming practice; or
7. Who petition the Board to be temporarily exempted due to
health, injury, or other personal exigent circumstance during the
year, if the Board approves such petition. A signed and sworn
affidavit and other documentation may be required by the Board. The
Board at its discretion may exempt an osteopathic physician for a
specific stated period of time.
B. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may promulgate
rules as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section
including, but not limited to, minimum requirements for professional
malpractice liability insurance policies and penalties for
noncompliance.
SECTION 19. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 642, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 642. A. If any licensee shall fail to comply with the
requirements of Section 641 of this title or this section and such
license is allowed to lapse, the licensee shall, upon order of the
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, forfeit the right to practice
osteopathic medicine in this state and the license and certificate
shall be canceled,; provided, however, that the Board may reinstate
such person upon the payment of all fees due, plus a penalty fee in
the amount fixed by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners not to
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 28

exceed twice the amount of the license renewal fees as determined by
the Board and upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of the
attendance at an educational program as provided for in Sections
637, 637.1, and 641 of this title and such other proof of
professional conduct as prescribed by rule. The State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners shall not place the license of any person
authorized to practice osteopathic medicine in this state on
inactive status.
B. Any licensee whose renewal application is rejected by the
Board shall have the right to appeal from such action to the
district court of the county of residence. If the licensee does not
reside or practice in this state, appeal shall be to the Oklahoma
County District Court.
C. Licensees who retire from such practice or desire to request
cancellation of their license shall file with the State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners an affidavit, on a form to be furnished by the
Board, which states the date of retirement and such other facts to
verify the retirement or other reasons for cancellation as the Board
may deem necessary and the license shall be canceled. If a licensee
desires to re-engage the practice, the licensee shall reinstate the
license as provided for in Sections 637, 637.1, and 641 of this
title and subsection A of this section.
SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 642.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every person licensed to practice osteopathic medicine by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall report within
fourteen (14) days any criminal investigation in a jurisdiction
which concerns that person.
B. Every person licensed to practice osteopathic medicine by
the Board shall report within fourteen (14) days any action taken to
limit their license, credentials, or other authorization to practice
osteopathic medicine.
C. If a person licensed to practice osteopathic medicine in
this state voluntarily resigns from the staff of a health care
institution, or voluntarily limits that person’s own staff
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 29

privileges at a health care institution or fails to reapply for
hospital or staff privileges at a health care institution, the
person shall report in writing such conduct to the Board within
fourteen (14) days. If the conduct occurs while the person is under
formal investigation by the institution or a committee thereof for
any reason related to possible unprofessional conduct or possible
inability to practice osteopathic medicine, that conduct shall be
included in the report.
D. Every person to whom a license to practice osteopathic
medicine is issued has a duty to report to the Board, within thirty
(30) days, all information concerning medical malpractice claims
settled or adjudicated to final judgment.
SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 642.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every person licensed to practice osteopathic medicine by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall report to the Board
information that the reporting person reasonably believes indicates
that a person licensed to practice medicine in this state is, or may
be, engaged in unprofessional conduct or may be unable to practice
medicine with reasonable skill or safety to patients.
B. An individual, institution, agency, or organization required
to report under this section who does so in good faith is not
subject to civil damages for reporting.
C. Upon receiving a complaint involving potential criminal
conduct, the Board shall promptly report the complaint to
appropriate law enforcement agencies.
SECTION 22. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 643, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 643. The funds received pursuant to the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act or the Oklahoma Abortion-Inducing Drug
Certification Program Act shall be deposited to the credit of the
State Board of Osteopathic Examiners Revolving Fund and may be
expended by the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners and under its
direction in assisting in the enforcement of the laws of this state
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 30

prohibiting the unlawful practice of osteopathic medicine, assisting
in the support of a peer assistance program, administering
continuing education programs to ensure the safety and well-being of
patients, sponsoring resident physician training, and for the
dissemination of information to prevent the violation of such laws,
and for the purchasing of supplies and such other expense as is
necessary to properly carry out the provisions of the Oklahoma
Osteopathic Medicine Act or the Oklahoma Abortion-Inducing Drug
Certification Program Act.
SECTION 23. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 644, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 644. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, to be
designated the “State Board of Osteopathic Examiner’s Examiners
Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Board pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act or the Oklahoma Abortion-Inducing Drug Certification
Program Act. All monies accruing to the credit of said the fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Board
for the purpose of enforcing the laws of this state which prohibit
the unlawful practice of osteopathic medicine, for the dissemination
of information to prevent the violation of such laws and, for the
purchase of supplies and such other expense as is necessary to
properly implement the provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic
Medicine Act or the Oklahoma Abortion-Inducing Drug Certification
Program Act, and for any other purpose specified in Section 643 of
this title. Expenditures from said the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims signed by an
authorized employee or employees of the State Board of Osteopathic
Examiners and filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 24. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 645, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 645. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall
adopt such rules as may be necessary to implement the provisions of
the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act and may establish fees
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 31

authorized but not specified in the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine
Act.
B. The Board shall promulgate rules to identify essential
elements of education and practice necessary to protect the public.
C. The Board may prescribe by rule administrative remedies,
disciplinary actions, sanctions, and administrative procedures to
provide remedies and disciplinary actions for licensee violations of
statutory- or regulatory-prescribed unprofessional conduct, to
include fines up to the limits otherwise prescribed by statute or
rule.
D. The Board may provide by rule procedures for the licensee to
contest or dispute any administrative action, procedures for
resolution of any such contest or dispute, and appropriate
protection of private information consistent with state and federal
law.
SECTION 25. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 631, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 26. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 32

Passed the Senate the 5th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 929 Page 33